Utah statutes.
70C-5-104.   Restoration of down payment.
(1)  Within ten days after a home solicitation sale has been canceled or an
offer to purchase revoked the seller shall tender to the buyer any payments
made by the buyer and any note or other evidence of indebtedness.
(2)  If the down payment includes goods traded in, the goods shall be tendered
in substantially as good condition as when received by the seller. If the
seller fails to tender the goods as provided by this section, the buyer may
recover an amount equal to the trade-in allowance stated in the agreement.
(3)  A provision permitting the seller to keep all or any part of any payment,
note, or evidence of indebtedness is in violation of this section and
unenforceable.
(4)  Until the seller has complied with the obligations imposed by this
section the buyer may retain possession of goods delivered to him by the
seller and has a lien on the goods in his possession or control for any
recovery to which he is entitled.
